Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.070

Plans and specifications to be prepared.

All road construction work, except minor construction work, which by its nature does not require plans and specifications, whether performed pursuant to contract or by day labor, shall be in accordance with plans and specifications prepared therefor by or under direct supervision of the county road engineer.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 11; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.070. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8c.]